Hawaii statutes.
§431:19-107 Financial statements and other
reports. (a) Each captive insurance
company other than a risk retention captive insurance company shall submit to the
commissioner financial statements reporting the financial condition and the
results of operations of the insurer written according to generally accepted
accounting principles, or other comprehensive basis of accounting as may be
deemed appropriate by the commissioner, and audited by an independent certified
public accountant, or other qualified professional as deemed appropriate by the
commissioner, on or before the last day of the sixth month following the end of
the company's fiscal year.

(b) Each risk retention captive insurance company shall annually file with the commissioner the
following:

(1) Annual
statement and audit:

(A) On or
before March 1, or such day subsequent thereto as the commissioner upon request
and for cause may specify, an annual statement using the National Association
of Insurance Commissioners' annual statement blank plus any additional
information required by the commissioner, which shall be a true statement of
its financial condition, transactions, and affairs as of the immediately
preceding December 31. The reported information shall be verified by oaths of
at least two of the captive's principal officers;

(B) On or
before June 1, or any day subsequent thereto as the commissioner upon request
and for cause may specify, an audit by a designated independent certified
public accountant or accounting firm of the financial statements reporting the
financial condition and results of the operation of the captive; and

(C) The annual statement and audit shall be
prepared in accordance with the National Association of Insurance
Commissioners' annual statement instructions, accounting practices and
procedures manual, and rules adopted by the commissioner following the
practices and procedures prescribed by the National Association of Insurance
Commissioners; and

(2) On or before
each March 1, or any day subsequent thereto as the commissioner upon request
and for cause may specify, a risk-based capital report in accordance with
section 431:3-402.

(c) The statements required to be filed in
subsections (a) and (b) shall include but not be limited to actuarially
appropriate reserves for the business underwritten. An actuarial opinion
regarding reserves for the business underwritten by the company shall be
included in the audited statements, except that the actuarial opinion for class
3 companies shall be filed with the annual statement required under subsection
(b), on or before March 1 each year. The actuarial opinion shall be given by a
member of the American Academy of Actuaries or other qualified loss reserve
specialist as defined in the annual statement adopted by the National
Association of Insurance Commissioners; provided that all captive insurance
companies, other than a class 3 company, may, alternatively, utilize an
actuarial opinion prepared by a loss reserve specialist deemed appropriate by
the commissioner.

(d) The commissioner may prescribe the format
and frequency of other reports which may include, but shall not be limited to,
summary loss reports and quarterly financial statements.

(e) The commissioner may suspend or revoke the
certificate of authority or fine any captive insurer that fails to file any of
the documents or reports required by this section. The fine shall be not more
than $500 per day past the due date.

(f) Each branch captive insurance company
shall file with the commissioner copies of all reports and financial statements
required to be filed by the outside captive insurance company of the branch
captive insurance company under the laws of the jurisdiction in which the
outside captive insurance company is domiciled. The copies of the reports and
financial statements shall be certified under oath by two officers of the
outside captive insurance company and shall be filed with the commissioner no
later than thirty days after the reports and financial statements are filed
with the insurance regulator of the domicile of the outside captive insurance
company. In addition to, and at the same time as the foregoing filings with
the commissioner, the outside captive insurance company shall file a statement
signed by two of its executive officers, one of which must be the president or
chief financial officer, setting forth the gross premiums written, reinsurance
ceded and accepted, and reserves and other liabilities associated with the
insurance business written through the branch captive insurance company in this
State.

If the commissioner is not satisfied that the
reports, financial statements, and statement required to be filed under this
subsection fairly and adequately describe the financial condition of the
outside captive insurance company and the business underwritten through the
branch captive insurance company in this State, the commissioner may require
the branch captive insurance company to file an annual statement pursuant to
subsection (a) within a reasonable time after notification of such requirement.
[L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; am L 1988, c 187, §10; am L 1994, c 190, §§4, 10; am
L 1995, c 61, §2 as superseded by c 232, §§2, 4; am L 1997, c 368, §7; am L
1998, c 72, §1; am L 1999, c 128, §2 and c 302, §§6, 9; am L 2000, c 36, §5, c
67, §2, and c 133, §5; am L 2003, c 209, §6 and c 212, §116; am L 2005, c 31,
§5; am L 2010, c 116, §1(25); am L 2012, c 253, §13]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next